California, session 20252026, SB107.
do enact as follows: SECTION 1. Section 19.564 of the Budget Act of 2023 is amended to read: SEC. 19.564. (a) (1) The amounts appropriated pursuant to this section reflect legislative priorities related to housing. (2) For allocations in this section that include a designated state entity, the entity shall allocate the funds to the recipients identified in the paragraphs following each designation. The state entity shall determine the best method for allocation to ensure the funds are used for the purposes specified in this section. Self-attestation by the receiving entity is an acceptable method of verification of the use of funds, if determined appropriate by the state entity. (3) Notwithstanding any other law, allocations pursuant to this section are exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual, and are not subject to the approval of the Department of General Services, including the requirements of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of the Title 2 of the Government Code. (4) If an item number for the appropriate department for a state entity does not exist, and such an item number is required in order to make the specified allocations, the Department of Finance may create an item number for this purpose. (5) Notwithstanding any other law, a designated state entity administering an allocation pursuant to this section may provide the allocation as an advance lump sum payment, and the allocation may be used to pay for costs incurred prior to the effective date of the act adding this paragraph. (6) The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of allocating authority to a different state entity to facilitate the expenditure of the funds for the intended legislative purpose. Any state entity that allocates funds may also, in consultation with the Department of Finance, use an alternative local fiscal agent that is not identified in this section instead of the fiscal agent designated in this section if necessary to achieve the intended legislative purpose. Any change to the allocating state entity or fiscal agent made pursuant to this paragraph shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in writing at least 30 days, or no sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine, prior to the change. It is the intent of the Legislature to revise this section during the 2023–24 fiscal year to reflect any changes necessary to achieve the intended legislative purpose. (7) Unless otherwise specified in this section, funds allocated pursuant to this section shall be available for encumbrance through June 30, 2025, and expenditure until June 30, 2027. (8) Unless otherwise specified, the funds appropriated in this section shall not be disbursed for any project prior to September 30, 2023. Future legislation may, but is not required to, specify further details concerning the manner of disbursement of these funds. (9) Funding provided in this section shall not be used for a purpose subject to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution. If the Department of Finance determines that any allocation would be considered an appropriation for that purpose, the funding shall not be allocated, and the department shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of that finding. (10) The amounts specified in subdivisions (b), inclusive, are hereby appropriated from the General Fund as follows: (b) To be allocated by the Department of Housing and Community Development as follows: (1) $225,000 to the City of West Sacramento, for the Recovery Café in West Sacramento. (2) $1,250,000 to the City of Half Moon Bay, for the City of Half Moon Bay: Coastside Farmworker Housing Development. (3) $1,250,000 to the County of San Mateo, for the County of San Mateo: Coastside Farmworker Housing Development. (4) $1,250,000 to the City of Alameda, for the Safe Parking and Homeless Day Center at Alameda Point. (5) $500,000 to the City of Culver City, for the Wende Museum: Affordable Housing for Artists at Risk. (6) $1,000,000 to the City of Culver City, for the Culver City – Jubilo Village Affordable Housing Development. (7) $1,000,000 to the Inland Equity Land Trust, for Plan Adelanto. (8) $500,000 to the City of Los Angeles, for the Renovations and Security Improvements at Huntington Villas. (9) $2,000,000 to the County of Sonoma, in partnership with the Sonoma County Community Development Commission (SCCDC), for the Tierra de Rosas Infrastructure Project. (10) $500,000 to the County of Tulare, for the Tulare County Homeless Housing. (11) $600,000 to the City of Los Angeles, for the RV Buyback and Disposal Program. (12) $2,000,000 for the San Fernando Valley Economic Development Center by New Economics for Women. (13) $300,000 to the City of Los Angeles, for the City of Los Angeles for rehabilitation at the Sieroty/Howard Johnson Homekey Site. (14) $1,000,000 to the Habitat for Humanity of Butte County, for the Habitat for Humanity of Butte County Projects. (15) $2,500,000 to the San Diego State University, for the San Diego State Imperial Valley Student Housing. (16) $2,000,000 to the Riverside County Housing Authority, for the Galilee Center Housing Shelter. (17) $1,000,000 to the City of Concord, for the Yellow Roof Foundation. (18) $1,000,000 to GLIDE, for the GLIDE Modernization Project. (19) $250,000 to the Homeless Prenatal Program, for the Homeless Prenatal Program. (20) $750,000 to the Sigma Beta Xi, Inc., for the SBX: Youth and Family Services Youth Village Project. (21) $1,000,000 to the Los Angeles County Development Agency (LACDA), for the Treehouse Leimert Park Housing Project. (22) $500,000 to the Los Angeles County Development Agency (LACDA) for the Biddy Mason South Los Angeles Mixed-Use Housing Project. (23) $500,000 to the Los Angeles County Department of Health Services, for the Los Angeles Skid Row Action Plan. (24) $2,000,000 to the City of San Jose, for the Eviction Diversion Program. (25) $200,000 to the Comite Civico Del Valle, for the Universidad Popular. (26) $750,000 to the San Diego Housing Commission, for the Homelessness Outreach Task Force. (27) $1,000,000 to the City of Los Angeles, for the City of Los Angeles motel to housing conversion. (28) $2,500,000 to the City of San Leandro, for the Nimitz Motel acquisition and renovation. (29) $200,000 to the City of Los Angeles, for the City of Los Angeles – Chatsworth Travelodge Homekey Site Safety Improvements. (30) $136,000 to the Vida Mobile Clinic, for the Vida Mobile Clinic Outreach & Medical Supplies. (31) $1,250,000 to Bridge to Home Santa Clarita Valley, for the Bridge to Home Family Housing Units & Client Service Center. (32) $1,000,000 to the City of Orange, for the City of Orange: Homeless Resource Center. (33) $1,500,000 to the City of Anaheim, for the City of Anaheim: Mobile Family Resource Center. (34) $400,000 to the City of Stockton, for the City of Stockton – Loads of Hope – Mobile Laundromat Service Vehicles for Homeless Individuals. (35) $1,435,000 to the Life Plan Humboldt, for the Life Plan Humboldt. (36) $2,500,000 for the town of Danville for implementation of the ADU Accelerator Program to grant funds to cities in Contra Costa and Alameda Counties for the creation of pre-approved permit ready accessory dwelling unit plans and an incentive program. (37) $500,000 to the City of West Hollywood for refurbishing of existing log cabin structure. (38) $5,000,000 for Stanislaus County for infrastructure projects in South Modesto. (39) $2,000,000 for the San Diego Housing Commission for predevelopment of the densification of Casa Colina Phase 1 in City Heights. (40) $2,000,000 for the City of Half Moon Bay for the planning and development of affordable housing. (41) $1,000,000 for Alta Housing for the development of senior affordable housing. (42) $5,000,000 for the City of Vista for interim and permanent support housing units. (43) $2,000,000 for the County of Fresno for design and construction costs of improvements in the communities of Cantua Creek and El Porvenir. (44) $240,000 for Habitat for Humanity Greater Fresno Area for program support. (45) $150,000 for the City of Reedley for improvements to transitional housing facility. (46) $500,000 for Hijas del Campo for construction of farmworker housing in east central Contra Costa County. (47) $150,000 for El Camino Homeless Organization for the construction of a permanent dining structure for individuals experiencing homelessness. (48) $84,000 for the City of Monterey for the lighting improvement project on Old Fisherman’s Wharf. (49) $1,000,000 for the County of Sonoma for the Casa Roseland Project. (50) $500,000 for the City of Los Angeles for the LA Family Housing to renovate interim housing units. (51) $3,000,000 for Neighborhood Legal Service of Los Angeles for the construction of the NLSLA Pacoima Justice and Job Training Center. (52) $1,100,000 to the City of Huntington Beach to support Operations of the Navigation Center for homeless individuals. (53) $3,000,000 for the City of Imperial for support of the Imperial Corridor Safety Improvements Project. (54) $2,000,000 for the Burbank Housing Corporation for affordable housing projects. (55) $2,000,000 for the City of Perris for construction of multipurpose/nutrition room at the Perris Senior Center. (56) $500,000 for the City of Riverside for local historical preservation efforts by the Civil Rights Institute of Inland Southern California. (57) $1,000,000 for the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments for purposes of homeless services education workforce development and public safety support. (58) $6,500,000 for Lao Family Community Development for infrastructure and capital improvements for units for unhoused people. (59) $3,000,000 for Eden Housing for Legacy Court housing project. (60) $2,000,000 for Unity Council for support of housing and community services and a housing and community project at the site of the Ghostship Warehouse fire. (61) $2,000,000 for St. Mary’s Center for property acquisition, maintenance, and operations for transitional housing for formerly homeless seniors. (62) $2,500,000 for the Los Angeles Black Worker Center for the establishment of a justice campus in the City of Los Angeles. (63) $3,000,000 for the City of Los Angeles for siting, design and construction of structures marking and identifying historic black neighborhoods in Los Angeles. (64) $3,500,000 for the California Black Freedom Fund for support of nonprofit organizations implementing civic engagement and voter education programs. (65) $4,750,000 for the City of Los Angeles, Mayor’s Office for neighborhood improvement, street safety, or active transportation projects in the San Fernando Valley. (66) $2,000,000 for the City of Orange for support of the Homeless Resource Center. (67) $4,000,000 for the City of Garden Grove for support of the Central Cities Navigation Center. (68) $2,500,000 for the City of Hayward for construction of the Stack Youth and Family Center Phase II. (69) $1,800,000 for the City for Santa Clara for support of Santa Clara Overnight Care locations. (70) $500,000 for the City of Fremont for support of Housing Navigation Center. (71) $1,500,000 for the City of Fremont for support of the Commercial District Wi-Fi Access Expansion Project. (72) $1,600,000 for the City of Milpitas for support of the Milpitas SMART program. (73) $1,500,000 for the National AIDS Memorial for establishment of the Center for Health and Social Justice. (74) $2,500,000 for the Southeast Asian Development Center for acquisition of a building to serve community members. (75) $1,000,000 for the City of Modesto for support of the Modesto Downtown Streets Teams. (76) $155,000 to Tuolumne County for the acquisition of property for the development of workforce housing. (77) $435,000 to the City of Turlock for parks and sewer infrastructure. SEC. 2. Section 39.10 of the Budget Act of 2023 is amended to read: SEC. 39.10. In addition to this act, the Budget Act of 2023 consists of the following statutes: (a) Chapter 12 of the Statutes of 2023 (Senate Bill No. 101). (b) Chapter 38 of the Statutes of 2023 (Assembly Bill No. 102). (c) Chapter 189 of the Statutes of 2023 (Senate Bill No. 104). (d) Chapter 862 of the Statutes of 2023 (Senate Bill No. 105). (e) Chapter 9 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 106). (f) Chapter 36 of the Statutes of 2024 (Senate Bill No. 109). (g) Chapter 996 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 158). (h) Chapter 2 of the Statutes of 2025 (Assembly Bill No. 100). (i) Chapter 6 of the Statutes of 2025 (Senate Bill No. 103). (j) Chapter 104 of the Statutes of 2025 (Senate Bill No. 105). SEC. 3. Item 3125-101-6093 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 3125-101-6093—For local assistance, California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 23,524,000 Schedule: (1) 2340-Tahoe Conservancy ........................ 23,524,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the purposes authorized in subdivision (i) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the amendment of existing program guidelines and selection criteria needed to effectuate or implement the appropriation in this item. 3. The amount appropriated in this item shall be exempt from any applicable law requiring competitive bidding or the supervision or approval of another department or agency of state government with the exception of the Department of General Services for the procurement of or contracting with vendors for work authorized in subdivision (i) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code. 4. The funds appropriated in this item are available for expenditure for state operations, local assistance, or capital outlay. The term “state operations” as used in conjunction with this appropriation means work completed on land owned by the state and under the jurisdiction of the California Tahoe Conservancy. The term “capital outlay” as used in conjunction with this appropriation means the acquisition, design, or construction of improvements on land owned, or leased, by the state and under the jurisdiction of the California Tahoe Conservancy. 5. Of the funds appropriated in this item, up to $2,550,000 shall be available to provide technical assistance to disadvantaged communities, severely disadvantaged communities, or vulnerable populations. SEC. 4. Item 6100-488 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 6100-488—Reappropriation, State Department of Education. Notwithstanding any other law, the balances from the following appropriations are available for reappropriation for the purposes specified in the provisions below: 0001—​General Fund (1) $220,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the K–12 Mandated Programs Block Grant in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-296-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). (2) $22,248,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the 21st Century Community Learning Centers Program in Schedule (2) of Item 6100-149-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (3) $204,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the California American Indian Education Centers in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-151-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). (4) $26,800,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Child Nutrition Programs in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-203-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). (5) $18,823,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Special Education Program for Individuals with Exceptional Needs in Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2021. (6) $1,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the American Indian Early Childhood Education Program in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-150-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (7) $500,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Special Education Program for Individuals with Exceptional Needs in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-161-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (8) $490,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the K–12 Mandated Programs Block Grant in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-296-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (9) $19,037,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-168-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (10) $150,000,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Inclusive Early Education Expansion Program in Schedule (3) of Item 6100-196-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (11) $1,000,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Reading Difficulties Risk Screener Selection Panel in Chapter 48 of the Statutes of 2023. (12) $5,072,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the California Community College Strong Workforce Program in Schedule (16) of Item 6870-101-0001, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020). (13) $292,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Adults in Correctional Facilities Program in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-158-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chapter 12, 38, and 189, Stats 2023). (14) $1,000,000 of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Expanded Learning Opportunities Program in Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2021. Provisions: 1. The sum of $239,395,000 is hereby appropriated to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for allocation to school districts and charter schools in the 2024–25 fiscal year pursuant to Section 42238.02 of the Education Code pursuant to the provisions provided in the 2024 Education Omnibus trailer bill for this purpose. 2. (a) The sum of $5,000,000 is hereby appropriated to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for allocation to the Marin County Office of Education to contract with the California Teachers Collaborative for Holocaust and Genocide Education to continue its work to do both of the following: (1) Develop and provide curriculum resources related to genocide and Holocaust education. (2) Provide professional development, including educator trainings, on genocide and Holocaust education. (b) The funds allocated pursuant to this provision are available for encumbrance and expenditure until June 30, 2029. (c) Of the amount appropriated in subprovision (a), no more than 5 percent shall be available for reimbursement to the Marin County Office of Education for administrative activities. 3. The sum of $292,000 is hereby appropriated to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for costs associated with administering the English Language Development Assessment, pursuant to Provision 9 of Item 6100-113-0001. 4. The sum of $1,000,000 is hereby appropriated to the Fiscal Crisis Management and Assistance Team for costs associated with providing technical assistance to local educational agencies impacted by fires pursuant to this provision. These funds shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2028. Notwithstanding any other law, the Los Angeles Unified School District, Pasadena Unified School District, and any impacted charter schools located within those school districts, may request, by June 30, 2025, the Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team to conduct an evaluation of the need for additional funding and statutory changes for the 2026–27, 2027–28, and 2028–29 fiscal years as a result of the state of emergency declared by the Governor in January 2025 and provide recommendations to the Department of Finance, the Legislature, and the Superintendent of Public Instruction by November 1, 2025. The Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team shall update this report by November 1, 2027, to evaluate the need for additional funding and statutory changes for the 2028–29 and 2029–30 fiscal years and shall conduct an interim evaluation of the Pasadena Unified School District by November 1, 2026, to assess the need for additional financial support in the 2027–28 fiscal year. SEC. 5. Section 39.10 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: SEC. 39.10. In addition to this act, the Budget Act of 2024 consists of the following statutes: (a) Chapter 22 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 107). (b) Chapter 35 of the Statutes of 2024 (Senate Bill No. 108). (c) Chapter 994 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 157). (d) Chapter 995 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 180). (e) Chapter 1 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session (Assembly Bill No. 4). (f) Chapter 2 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session (Senate Bill No. 3). (g) Chapter 3 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session (Senate Bill No. 1). (h) Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session (Senate Bill No. 2). (i) Chapter 2 of the Statutes of 2025 (Assembly Bill No. 100). (j) Chapter 6 of the Statutes of 2025 (Senate Bill No. 103). (k) Chapter 104 of the Statutes of 2025 (Senate Bill No. 105). SEC. 6. Item 0250-494 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 0250-494—Reappropriation, Judicial Council. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure as specified below: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $3,440,000 in Schedule (3) and Schedule (5) of Item 0250-001-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, to continue a contract with the State Department of State Hospitals for improvements to the Incompetent to Stand Trial evaluations. (2) Up to $1,400,000 in Item 0250-001-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023) 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, for implementation of Chapter 539 of the Statutes of 2022. SEC. 7. Item 0509-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 0509-101-0001—For local assistance, Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development (GO-Biz) ........................ 120,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0220-GO-Biz ........................ 100,000,000120,000,000 (2) 0235019-Tourism 20,000,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $100,000,000 shall be available to the City of Fresno to support the city’s Public Infrastructure Plan. 2. The funds appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be available for the California Travel and Tourism Commission to promote travel and tourism. SEC. 8. Item 0540-103-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 0540-103-0001—For local assistance, Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency ........................ 61,795,00061,045,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 61,795,00061,045,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $13,620,000 shall be available for Clear Lake Restoration. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $5,400,000 shall be available to the Jewish Community Center of the East Bay for security and infrastructure. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be available for the Los Angeles Holocaust Memorial. 4. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $3,095,000 shall be available to the Child and Family Center for facility purchase, infrastructure improvements, vehicle purchases, and services. 5. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $2,500,000 shall be available to the City of San Diego for the Rancho Bernardo Community Park. 6. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available to the City of San Diego for vegetation management. 7. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available to the Escondido YMCA for infrastructure improvements and repairs. 9. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to the San Francisco Parks and Recreation Department for Portsmouth Square. 10. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available to the City of Healdsburg for the Healdsburg Villa Community Center Modernization project. 11. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $50,000 shall be available to the County of Humboldt for the McKinleyville City Incorporation exploration feasibility study. 12. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $500,000 shall be available to the County of Sonoma for ADA improvements and rehabilitation of the County Veterans Building in Cloverdale. 13. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to the City of La Puente for the completion of an animal shelter expansion and service K9 training center. 14. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to the City of San Pablo for the McNeil Park Project. 15. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $500,000 shall be available to the City of Sacramento for infrastructure projects within City Council District 1. 16. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,175,000 shall be available to the City of Mission Viejo for the Mission Viejo Oso Creek Trail Improvement project. 17. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $3,590,000 shall be available to the City of Oceanside to support the expansion of the Oceanside Museum of Art. 18. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $265,000 shall be available to the City of San Juan for support of the La Novia urban garden project. 19. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $300,000 shall be available to the City of Solana Beach for the Coastal Rail Trail extension. 20. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $2,000,000 shall be available to the City of San Jose to support the planning and construction of the School of Arts and Culture at the Mexican Heritage Plaza. 21. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to the City of Avalon for pier repairs. 22. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to the Bixby Knows Community Foundation to support the Clean and Safe program and assist small business and non-profit engagement. 23. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,385,000 shall be available to the City of San Diego for public improvements to the Lake Hodges Dam, the Hodges Reservoir, the El Capitan Dam, and the El Capitan Reservoir. 24. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $615,000 shall be available to the San Diego Mountain Biking Association for building and maintaining public trails for mountain biking. 25. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $50,000 shall be available to the City and County of San Francisco for ADA restroom improvement at the Charity Cultural Services Center. 26. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $750,000 shall be available to the University of Southern California for ONE Archives and for distribution to other non-profit entities for the purposes of archiving LGBTQ+ historical materials. 27. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to the City of Newark for support of the improvements plan for Ash Street Park facilities. 28. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $2,000,000 shall be available to the City of Los Angeles Department of Parks and Recreation to rebuild and rehabilitate library and other recreation facilities affected by the Palisades Fire. 29. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $2,000,000 shall be available to the California Community Foundation for collaboration with the CONSORTIUM (Community-Oriented Network for Scientific Observation, Recovery, and Tracking of Impacts of Urban Megafires) on a pilot project to remediate homes with the highest levels of lead contamination in the Eaton burn area. 30. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be available to the City and County of San Francisco to support the preservation and revitalization of a historic LGBTQ+ venue that will advance economic development in the Castro neighborhood. 31. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available for support costs to administer the funding appropriated in this item. SEC. 9. Item 1700-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 1700-001-0001—For support of Civil Rights Department ........................ 64,469,00070,469,000 Schedule: (1) 1490-Administration of Civil Rights Law ........................ 63,819,00069,819,000 (2) 1495-Civil Rights Council ........................ 221,000 (3) 1500-Department of Justice Legal Services ........................ 429,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item, $2,383,000 allocated for the California vs. Hate Resource Line shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services, including as specified in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. 2. Provision 1 is only applicable for fiscal year 2025–26. It is the intent of the Legislature that any extension of the California vs. Hate Resource Line beyond the 2025–26 fiscal year will not be exempted from these contracting requirements. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item, $883,000 shall be available to continue the work of the Community Reconciliation Unit through June 30, 2026, to respond to and help resolve discrimination-based community conflicts through customized conflict resolution, community engagement facilitation, mediation of community disputes, and civil rights-related conflict resolution education, consultation, and training. 4. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item, $1,422,000 shall be available to extend the Investigation, Enforcement, and Conciliation Enhancement program through June 30, 2026, in order to further decrease the wait time between complaint intakes and investigative appointments, and to increase the number of complaints successfully conciliated and settled by investigators. 5. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item, $6,000,000 shall be available to support implementation of Chapter 586 of the Statutes of 2025 that establishes the Bureau for Descendants of American Slavery. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. SEC. 10. Item 1700-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is repealed. 1700-101-0001—For local assistance, Civil Rights Department 6,000,000Schedule:(1)1490-Administration of Civil Rights Law6,000,000Provisions:1.The amount appropriated in this item shall be available to support implementation of pending legislation that establishes the Bureau for Descendants of American Slavery, subject to enactment. SEC. 11. Item 3100-001-0890 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3100-001-0890—For support of Exposition Park, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 1,039,000 Schedule: (1) 2305-Exposition Park Management ........................ 1,039,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 12. Item 3125-102-6093 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3125-102-6093—For local assistance, California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 5,222,000 Schedule: (1) 2340-Tahoe Conservancy ........................ 5,222,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to reduce the risks of climate change impacts upon communities, fish, wildlife, and natural resources, and to increase public access and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 2. The funds appropriated in this item are available for expenditure for state operations, local assistance, or capital outlay. The term “state operations” as used in conjunction with this appropriation means work completed on land owned by the state and under the jurisdiction of the California Tahoe Conservancy. The term “capital outlay” as used in conjunction with this appropriation means the acquisition, design, or construction of improvements on land owned, or leased, by the state and under the jurisdiction of the California Tahoe Conservancy. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item, up to $2,900,000 shall be available to provide technical assistance to disadvantaged communities, severely disadvantaged communities, or vulnerable populations. SEC. 13. Item 3360-001-3228 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3360-001-3228—For support of State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund ........................ 2,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2390010-Transportation Technology and Fuels ........................ 2,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be used for administrative costs to support the deployment of charging or refueling infrastructure for medium- and heavy-duty zero-emission vehicles. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in this item may be transferred to Item 3360-101-3228. These transfers shall require the prior approval of the Department of Finance. 3. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure by the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission until June 30, 2029, and available for liquidation until June 30, 2033. SEC. 14. Item 3360-101-3228 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3360-101-3228—For local assistance, State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, payable from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund ........................ 38,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2390010-Transportation Technology and Fuels ........................ 38,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be used to support the deployment of charging or refueling infrastructure for medium- and heavy-duty zero-emission vehicles. 2. With the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission shall administer a program to fund projects consistent with Section 44272 of the Health and Safety Code, and consistent with the following requirements: (a) The commission may add these funds to existing competitively awarded agreements if existing competitive agreements are consistent with the use of funds described in Provision 1 of this item. (b) The commission may adopt guidelines or other standards for this program at a commission business meeting following at least one public workshop. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to guidelines or other standards for the program adopted at a commission business meeting. 3. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure by the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission until June 30, 2029, and available for liquidation until June 30, 2033. SEC. 15. Item 3480-001-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3480-001-0890—For support of Department of Conservation, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 5,658,0006,143,000 Schedule: (1) 2420-Geologic Hazards and Mineral Resources Conservation ........................ 1,129,000 (2) 2425-Geologic Energy Management Division ........................ 3,523,0004,008,000 (3) 2435-Division of Mine Reclamation ........................ 1,006,000 SEC. 16. Item 3540-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3540-001-0001—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection ........................ 1,396,397,000 Schedule: (1) 2461-Office of the State Fire Marshal ........................ 33,618,000 (2) 2465-Fire Protection ........................ 2,108,851,000 (3) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 21,268,000 (4) 2475-Board of Forestry and Fire Protection ........................ 370,000 (5) 2480-Department of Justice Legal Services ........................ 6,828,000 (6) 9900100-Administration ........................ 215,314,000 (7) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −214,944,000 (8) Reimbursements to 2461-Office of the State Fire Marshal ........................ −25,567,000 (9) Reimbursements to 2465-Fire Protection ........................ −747,395,000 (10) Reimbursements to 2470-Resource Management ........................ −1,576,000 (11) Reimbursements to 9900100-Administration ........................ −370,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize the temporary or permanent redirection of funds from this item for purposes of emergency fire suppression and detection costs and related emergency revegetation costs. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund, in an amount not to exceed 45 percent of reimbursements appropriated in Schedule (9) of this item, to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, provided that: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from the delay in receipt of reimbursements for services provided. (b) The loan is for a short term and shall be repaid by November 15 of the fiscal year following that in which the loan was authorized. (c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. (d) Within 10 days after approval, the Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of the loan approved pursuant to this provision. 3. The Director of Finance may adjust amounts in Schedule (2) to provide equivalent fire protection base funding changes to contract counties in accordance with Section 4130 of the Public Resources Code. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, the funds appropriated in this item for purposes of Division 10.5 (commencing with Section 12200) of the Public Resources Code shall be available for purposes of support or capital outlay. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may adjust this item for the direct and indirect cost reimbursements received pursuant to Sections 4142 and 4144 of the Public Resources Code. Any increase shall occur no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity of the increase to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after notification the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the Chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 6. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection may provide contractual services pursuant to Sections 4142 and 4144 of the Public Resources Code without an executed agreement from July to September of each fiscal year to better align contract start times with the budget process and to finalize staff benefit rates that are dependent upon actions by the Public Employees’ Retirement System and passage of the annual Budget Act. 7. Notwithstanding any other law or administrative procedure, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection may amend its pilot and mechanic contract, along with its parts contract, for both scope changes and contracted amounts to address unanticipated workload resulting from higher than anticipated demand for these contracted services. The Department of Finance may augment this item and authorize expenditures in excess of the amounts appropriated in this item no sooner than 30 days after providing notification in writing of the necessity therefor to the Chairperson of the committee in each house of the Legislature that considers appropriations, the Chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider the budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the Chairperson of the joint committee, or the Chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 9. Notwithstanding Section 28.00 of this act, upon request of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, the Department of Finance may adjust Schedules (2) and (9) of this item to reflect increases in reimbursements from non-state entities providing assistance-by-hire emergency fire suppression services. The Director of Finance may authorize expenditures in excess of the amount appropriated in this item after the receipt of the request from the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection. Within 10 days of approval, the Department of Finance shall provide written notification of any such augmentation to the Chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the Chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees of each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 11. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,250,000 shall be available for deferred maintenance and special repair projects at existing Department of Forestry and Fire Protection facilities to accommodate additional hand crews. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. 12. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $3,000,000 shall be available for a home hardening program, contingent upon passage of future legislation. 13. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,804,000 shall be exempt from any applicable law requiring competitive bidding or the supervision or approval of another department or agency of state government for the procurement of or contracting with vendors for logistical support, including, but not limited to, feeding, lodging, training, and the purchase of personal protective equipment for additional fire suppression staff hired for the implementation of the 66-hour workweek. 14. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $39,000,000 shall be used to begin transitioning a portion of Firefighter I positions within the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection to a permanent firefighter employment classification. Of the amount specified in this provision, $5,978,000 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure for deferred maintenance, special repairs, or the purchase of vehicles, automatic vehicle locators, and mobile radios until June 30, 2029. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate $78,000,000 in 2026-27 and ongoing for this purpose. It is the intent of the Legislature to transition the remainder of the existing Firefighter I positions to a permanent firefighter employment classification, subject to enactment of future legislation and appropriation of necessary funding. SEC. 17. Item 3540-002-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3540-002-6093—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 2,500,000 Schedule: (1) 2465-Fire Protection ........................ 2,500,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the creation or expansion of a fire training center and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and for liquidation until June 30, 2031. SEC. 18. Item 3540-101-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3540-101-0890—For local assistance, Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 10,000,00024,594,000 Schedule: (1) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 10,000,00024,594,000 SEC. 19. Section 3540-102-6093 of the Budget Act of 2025 is repealed. 3540-102-6093—For local assistance, Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund2,500,000Schedule:(1)2465-Fire Protection2,500,000Provisions:1.The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for the creation or expansion of a fire training center and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028, and for liquidation until June 30, 2031. SEC. 20. Item 3560-101-6093 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3560-101-6093—For local assistance, State Lands Commission, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 20,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2565-Land Management ........................ 20,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are available for the purposes of the Hollister Ranch Public Access Plan, including public access improvements at Hollister Ranch. Of this amount, $5,000,000 is available immediately for a pilot program to inform the final Environmental Impact Statement. 2. The funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 21. Item 3720-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is repealed. 3720-101-0001—For local assistance, California Coastal Commission 2,000,000Schedule:(1)2730-Coastal Management Program2,000,000Provisions:1.The funds appropriated in this item shall be available to the City of Petaluma for the Petaluma River Foundation. SEC. 22. Item 3760-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3760-101-0001—For local assistance, State Coastal Conservancy ........................ 6,000,0008,000,000 Schedule: (1) 2805032-Conservancy Programs ........................ 6,000,0008,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds Of the amount appropriated in this item item, $6,000,000 shall be available for the Great Redwood Trail Agency for general operations and trail and restoration planning, design, construction, and implementation. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $2,000,000 shall be available to the City of Petaluma for the Petaluma River Foundation. SEC. 23. Item 3790-003-6093 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3790-003-6093—For support of Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 56,750,000 Schedule: (1) 2840-Support of the Department of Parks and Recreation ........................ 56,750,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. 2. The Department of Parks and Recreation is exempted from any applicable law requiring competitive bidding and the supervision or approval of another state department or agency, with the exception of the Department of General Services, for the procurement of or contracting with vendors for forest health, fire prevention, fuels reduction, vegetation management, or environmental review, up to the amount appropriated in this item. SEC. 24. Item 3790-101-0516 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3790-101-0516—For local assistance, Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund ........................ 10,400,00011,400,000 Schedule: (1) 2855019-Boating Facilities ........................ 2,300,0003,300,000 (a) Quagga and Zebra Mussel Infestation Prevention Grants ........................ (2,000,000)(3,000,000) (b) Statewide Floating Restrooms ........................ (300,000) (2) 2855023-Boating Operations ........................ 8,100,000 (a) Boating Safety and Enforcement ........................ (8,100,000) Provisions: 1. The amounts appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. SEC. 25. Item 3790-102-6093 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3790-102-6093—For local assistance, Department of Parks and Recreation, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 105,500,00085,500,000 Schedule: (1) 2855036-Local Assistance Grants ........................ 105,500,00085,500,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item: (a) $20,000,000 is available for the reduction of climate impacts on disadvantaged communities and vulnerable populations and the creation, protection, and expansion of outdoor recreation opportunities. Of this amount, $10,000,000 is available for the restoration, rehabilitation, protection, and capital improvement of former airport lands to create parks and open space. (b) $20,000,000 is available for the purposes of the Hollister Ranch Public Access Plan, including public access improvements at Hollister Ranch. Of this amount, $5,000,000 is available immediately for a pilot program to inform the final Environmental Impact Statement. (c) $22,000,000 is available for Sepulveda Basin Park Cleanup. (d) $16,200,000 is available for the Eaton Canyon Natural Area and Nature Center. (e) $5,500,000 is available for the Charles White Park. (f) $5,000,000 is available for City of San Marcos Park improvements. (g) $5,000,000 is available for the Hughes Fire Recovery at Castaic Lake. (h) $5,000,000 is available for Rosemead Park improvements. (i) $4,300,000 is available for the Grove Neighborhood Park project. (j) $2,000,000 is available for the Don Fernando Pacheco Adobe rehabilitation. (k) $500,000 is available for Flat Top Park. 2. The funds in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 26. Item 3900-001-0115 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3900-001-0115—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Air Pollution Control Fund ........................ 78,736,00082,342,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 36,972,00040,578,000 (2) 3505-Stationary Source ........................ 33,634,000 (3) 3510-Climate Change ........................ 3,298,000 (4) 3530-Community Air Protection ........................ 4,832,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in Schedule (1) and Schedule (2) includes revenues derived from the assessment of fines and penalties imposed as specified in Section 13332.18 of the Government Code. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $2,283,000 will be available for expenditure upon submission to the California Environmental Policy Council for its consideration of the written summary and results of the peer review for the multimedia evaluation of E11-E15 gasoline-ethanol blends. SEC. 27. Item 3900-001-3359 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3900-001-3359—For support of State Air Resources Board, payable from the Certification and Compliance Fund ........................ 64,279,00060,673,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 64,279,00060,673,000 SEC. 28. Item 4260-116-3397 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 4260-116-3397—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Opioid Settlements Fund ........................ 22,964,0002,964,000 Schedule: (1) 3960050-Other Care Services ........................ 22,964,0002,964,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance may approve a request to augment this item by up to $15,250,000 to support expansion of the Naloxone Distribution Project if the Department of Finance determines sufficient resources are available in the Opioid Settlements Fund to support the augmentation. 2. Upon order of the Director of Finance, the Controller shall transfer funds received in the Litigation Deposits Fund allocated to the state for state opioid remediation from the Purdue Pharma bankruptcy, including any related settlements with the Sackler Family, to the Opioid Settlements Fund. SEC. 29. Item 6100-134-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-134-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Education, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 2,482,363,000 Schedule: (1) 5200103-Statewide System of School Support ........................ 5,000,000 (2) 5200135-Title I, Elementary and Secondary Education Act ........................ 2,314,245,000 (3) 5200120-Title IV, Student Support and Academic Enrichment ........................ 163,118,000 Provisions: 1. In administering the accountability system required by this item, the State Department of Education shall align the forms, processes, and procedures required of local educational agencies so that duplication of effort is minimized at the local level. 2. The State Department of Education shall provide to the Legislature, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the Department of Finance a letter by April 15, of each year, reporting expenditures and anticipated savings for each schedule, based on available information. 3. The funds appropriated in this item shall be considered offsetting revenues within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 17556 of the Government Code for any reimbursable mandated cost claim for activities that result from implementation of the California State Plan for the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). Local educational agencies accepting funding from this item shall reduce any estimated and actual mandate reimbursement claims by the amount of funding provided to them from this item. 4. The State Department of Education shall submit an expenditure plan prior to the expenditure of funds to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee that includes the use of federal funds pursuant to the California State Plan for the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). 5. As a condition of receipt of funds appropriated in this item, the local educational agency’s plan for use of federal funds required pursuant to Section 1112 of Part A of Title I of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6312) shall be approved by the State Board of Education. Approval of such plans shall be contingent on the local educational agency’s demonstration that its planned use of the federal funds will supplement and enhance local priorities or initiatives funded with state funds, as reflected in the local educational agency’s local control and accountability plan. 6. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), no less than	$147,214,000 $146,281,000 is available for purposes of providing grants to local educational agencies with schools identified as requiring support, consistent with the California State Plan for the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). The State Department of Education shall develop and administer a process for providing grants from these funds on a formula basis to local educational agencies with schools identified as requiring support. Local educational agencies shall use the funds for the development of strategies to improve pupil performance at schools identified as requiring support that are aligned to goals, actions, and services identified in the local educational agency’s local control and accountability plan. Such funds shall not be expended to hire additional permanent staff. 7. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be allocated to county offices of education for the purposes of supporting development and implementation of comprehensive support and improvement (CSI) plans in coordination with the statewide system support for local educational agencies established in the California State Plan for the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). The State Department of Education shall develop, in consultation with the Executive Director of the State Board of Education and with the approval of the Department of Finance, the method of allocation for these funds, which shall be based on a formula that considers the number of schools within a county that are identified for additional support consistent with the California State Plan for the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). 8. The funds appropriated in Schedule (3) are available on a one-time basis, and shall be used in accordance with Part A of Title IV of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). 9. The funds appropriated in Schedule (3) shall be allocated to local educational agencies pursuant to Section 4105 of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 7115), as reauthorized by the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95). 10. For purposes of performing the calculation to ensure that no less than 95 percent of the state’s reserve is being allocated as grants to local educational agencies, pursuant to Section 1003 of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95), the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) and the amount specified in Provision 6 shall be added together. 11. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $5,000,000 shall be allocated to county offices of education for the purposes of review and approval of comprehensive support and improvement (CSI) plans through the CSI prompts in the local control and accountability plan. The method of allocation shall be the same as the one developed and approved pursuant to Provision 7. 12. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $70,000,000 is provided in one-time federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95), Title I, carryover funds to support the existing program. 13. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), $5,000,000 is provided in one-time federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95), Title IV, carryover funds to support the existing program. SEC. 30. Item 6120-011-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6120-011-0001—For support of California State Library and California Library Services Board ........................ 28,115,00028,915,000 Schedule: (1) 5310-State Library Services ........................ 22,751,00023,451,000 (2) 5312-Library Development Services ........................ 2,105,0002,205,000 (3) 5314-Information Technology Services ........................ 3,559,000 (4) Reimbursements to 5310-State Library Services ........................ −300,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $500,000 shall continue to be provided to the Braille Institute of America in Los Angeles. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $800,000 shall be available on a one-time basis to support Braille Institute programming. SEC. 31. Item 6120-217-0001 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 6120-217-0001—For local assistance, California State Library ........................ 750,000 Schedule: (1) 5312-Library Development Services ........................ 750,000 Provisions: 1. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $750,000 shall be available on a one-time basis to support competitive grants for the preservation and public accessibility of Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender, and Queer archives statewide. SEC. 32. Item 7600-001-0004 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 7600-001-0004—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Breast Cancer Fund ........................ 581,000503,000 Schedule: (1) 6275-Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 581,000503,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding Section 30461.6 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or any other provision of law, sufficient funds to cover the costs of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration for the collection and enforcement of fees to be deposited in the Breast Cancer Fund shall be retained in the fund, and be available to be appropriated to the department. SEC. 33. Item 7600-001-3418 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 7600-001-3418—For support of California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, payable from the Covered Battery-Embedded Waste Recycling Fee Subaccount, Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account ........................ 1,601,0001,061,000 Schedule: (1) 6275 - Administration of the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration ........................ 1,061,000 SEC. 34. Item 7760-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 7760-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of General Services ........................ 42,885,00043,749,000 Schedule: (1) 6320019-Public School Construction ........................ 3,000,000 (2) (9900100-Administration) ........................ 39,885,00040,749,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be used to fund the STEM Teacher Recruitment Grant at EnCorps, Inc. Notwithstanding any other law, funds provided in this provision may be transferred to Item 6350-601-0001 for distribution by the Office of Public School Construction, Department of General Services. This amount shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure through the 2027–28 fiscal year. 2. The amount appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be used to fund the California iteration of Dolly Parton’s Imagination Library. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of General Services may allocate funds as direct payment to the Dollywood Foundation for this purpose. The amount appropriated shall be allocated to the Dollywood Foundation by no later than 45 days after the enactment of the act adding this provision. 3. It is the intent of the Legislature that the amount appropriated in Schedule (2) to fund the California iteration of Dolly Parton’s Imagination Library shall align to the total reverted fund balance in Item 6120-495 for the California State Library. If the reverted fund balance in Item 6120-495 exceeds the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), the Department of Finance shall augment Schedule (2) of this item up to the reverted fund balance. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported within 10 days of approval to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the chairpersons of the committees and appropriate subcommittees that consider the state budget. SEC. 35. Item 8570-001-6093 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 8570-001-6093—For support of Department of Food and Agriculture, payable from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund ........................ 23,630,000 Schedule: (1) 6570-Agricultural Plant and Animal Health; Pest Prevention; Food Safety Services ........................ 19,850,000 (2) 6575-Marketing; Commodities and Agricultural Services ........................ 1,050,000 (3) 6580- Assistance to Fair and County Agricultural Activities ........................ 700,000 (4) 6590-General Agricultural Activities ........................ 2,030,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028 for the Invasive Species Program. SEC. 36. Section 15.01 is added to the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 15.01. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the development and adoption of program guidelines and selection criteria needed to effectuate or implement any program that is funded by any appropriation made in the Budget Act of 2025, or in any bill identified in Section 39.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund established pursuant to Section 90500 of the Public Resources Code. SEC. 37. Section 39.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: SEC. 39.00. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the following bills are other bills providing for appropriations related to the Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution: AB 116, AB 117, AB 117, AB 118, AB 119, AB 120, AB 121, AB 122, AB 123, AB 124, AB 125, AB 126, AB 127, AB 128, AB 129, AB 130, AB 131, AB 132, AB 133, AB 134, AB 135, AB 136, AB 137, AB 138, AB 139, AB 140, AB 141, AB 143, AB 144, AB 145, AB 146, AB 147, AB 148, AB 149, AB 150, AB 151, AB 152, AB 153, AB 154, AB 155, AB 156, AB 157, AB 158, AB 159, AB 160, AB 161, AB 162, SB 116, SB 117, SB 117, SB 118, SB 119, SB 120, SB 121, SB 122, SB 123, SB 124, SB 125, SB 126, SB 127, SB 128, SB 129, SB 130, SB 131, SB 132, SB 133, SB 134, SB 135, SB 136, SB 137, SB 138, SB 139, SB 140, SB 141, SB 143, SB 144, SB 145, SB 146, SB 147, SB 148, SB 149, SB 150, SB 151, SB 152, SB 153, SB 154, SB 155 SB 156, SB 157, SB 158, SB 159, SB 160, SB 161, and SB 162. SEC. 38. Section 39.10 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: SEC. 39.10. In addition to this act, the Budget Act of 2025 consists of the following statutes: (a) Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 2025 (Senate Bill No. 101). (b) Chapter 5 of the Statutes of 2025 (Assembly Bill No. 102). (c) Chapter 77 of the Statutes of 2025 (Assembly Bill No. 104). (d) Chapter 104 of the Statutes of 2025 (Senate Bill No. 105). (e) Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 2026 (Senate Bill No. 106). SEC. 39. Section 99.50 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: INDEX FOR CONTROL SECTIONS SEC. 99.50. The following is an index to the general sections of this act. These sections serve to define terms and identify restrictions concerning the appropriations contained in this act. 1.00 Budget Act Citation 1.50 Intent and Format 1.51 Citations to Prior Budget Acts 1.80 Availability of Appropriations 2.00 Items of Appropriation 3.00 Defines Purposes of Appropriations 3.10 Subschedule Transfers for Capital Projects 3.50 Benefit Charges Against Salaries and Wages 3.60 Contribution to Public Employees’ Retirement Benefits 3.61 Contribution to Prefund Other Postemployment Benefits 3.90 Reduction for Employee Compensation 4.05 Budget Adjustment Authority 4.11 Position Vacancy Report 4.12 Vacant Position Elimination 4.13 AB 85 Repayments to Counties 4.20 Contribution to Public Employees’ Contingency Reserve  Fund 4.30 Lease-Revenue Payment Adjustments 4.72 Electric Vehicle Charging Infrastructure 4.75 Statewide Surcharge 4.80 State Public Works Board Interim Financing 4.90 Architectural Revolving Fund Transfer 4.95 Inmate and Ward Construction Revolving Account Transfer 5.25 Attorney’s Fees 6.00 Project Alterations Limits 8.00 Antiterrorism Federal Reimbursements 8.50 Federal Funds Receipts 8.51 Federal Funds Accounts 8.52 Federal Reimbursements 8.53 Notice of Federal Audits 8.54 Enforce Recovery of Federal Funds for Statewide Indirect  Costs 8.75 Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act 9.30 Federal Levy of State Funds 9.50 Minor Capital Outlay Projects 11.00 Information Technology Reporting Requirements 11.10 Reporting of Statewide Software License Agreements 11.11 Privacy of Information in Pay Stubs 11.25 Artificial Intelligence Projects in State Departments 11.96 Coronavirus Fiscal Relief 11.97 State Appropriation Limit Excludable Federal Fund  Appropriations for Capital Outlay 12.00 State Appropriations Limit (SAL) 12.30 Special Fund for Economic Uncertainties 12.32 Proposition 98-Funding Guarantee 12.35 Financial Aid Policy Change Requirements 12.45 June to July Payroll Deferral 13.00 Legislative Counsel Bureau 13.30 Emergency Loans for Local Entities 13.40 Budgetary Loan Borrowing from Special Funds 14.00 Special Fund Loans Between Boards of the Department of  Consumer Affairs 15.01 Proposition 4 Appropriations 15.14 Allocation of Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund 15.25 Data Center Rate Adjustment 15.45 Trial Court Funding Offsets 19.56 Appropriations for Legislative Priorities 19.57 Encumbrance Deadline Extension Authority 20.00 Reappropriations and Reversions 24.00 State School Fund Allocations 24.03 Reading Control 24.30 Transfer School Building Rental Income to the General  Fund 24.60 Report of Lottery Funds Received 24.70 Local Educational Agency Fiscal Accountability 25.40 Contracted Fiscal Services Costs 25.50 SCO Apportionment Payment System Assessments 26.00 Intraschedule Transfers 28.00 Program Change Notification 28.30 Federal Funds Realignment 28.31 Short-Term Cash Loans Due to Delay in Federal Funds 28.50 Agency Reimbursement Payments 29.00 Position Estimates of Governor’s Budget, May Revision, and Final Change Book 30.00 Continuous Appropriations 31.00 Budget Act Administrative Procedures for Salaries  and Wages 32.00 Prohibits Excess Expenditures 33.00 Item Veto Severability 34.00 Constitutional Severability 35.21 Application of Net Final Payment Accrual Methodology 35.35 FI$Cal—​Short-Term Cash Loans 35.50 Estimated General Fund Revenues and Various Estimates  Related to the Budget Stabilization Account 38.00 Provides That This Bill Is a Budget Bill 39.00 Identification of Bills Related to the Budget Bill 39.10 List of Budget Act Statutes 90.00 Los Angeles County Response and Recovery Costs 91.00 Loans for Specific Local Governments 92.00 Augmentations for Particular Bills 99.00 Alphabetical Organization Index 99.50 Numerical Control Section Index SEC. 40. This act is a Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall take effect immediately. SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact statutory changes relating to the Budget Act of 2025.